District of Columbia statutes.
42-1233

Recording of documents.

(a)

The Recorder of Deeds may receive, index, store, archive, and transmit electronic documents or digitized images.

(b)

The Recorder of Deeds may provide for access to, and for search and retrieval of, documents and information by electronic means.

(c)

The Recorder of Deeds, in addition to accepting electronic documents or digitized images for recording shall continue to accept paper documents and shall place entries for both types of documents in the same index.

(d)

The Recorder of Deeds may convert paper documents accepted for recording into electronic form. The Recorder of Deeds may convert into electronic form information recorded before the Recorder of Deeds began to record electronic documents.

(e)

Any fee, surcharge, or tax that the Recorder of Deeds is authorized to collect may be collected electronically.

(f)

The Recorder of Deeds and other officials of a state or a political subdivision thereof, or of the United States, may agree on procedures or processes to facilitate the electronic satisfaction of prior approvals and conditions precedent to recording and the electronic payment of fees and taxes.

(g)

Any electronic documents or digitized images accepted by the Recorder of Deeds prior to October 18, 2005, are deemed to be recorded properly and to impart constructive notice.

(h)

Any electronic document or digitized image recorded at the Recorder of Deeds shall be deemed recorded as of the date and time of its delivery to the Recorder of Deeds; provided, that the document or digitized image is accepted by the Recorder of Deeds for recordation. The Recorder of Deeds shall maintain a record of time and date of delivery in its index.

Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-25, § 4, 52 DCR 8084

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act.

Editor's Notes